District of Columbia statutes.
9-101.03

Certain public roads declared public highways.

All public roads within said District, outside the limits of Washington and Georgetown, which were duly laid out or declared and recorded as such on June 22, 1874, are public highways.

History

R.S., D.C., § 246

Cross References

City of Georgetown, abolition, see § 1-107.
Public ways, streets and alleys on recorded plats, see § 1-1314.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-104.
1973 Ed., § 7-104.